Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.170

Rights and duties of warehouse operator—Special disposition of commodities under written order.

If the owner of the commodity or his or her authorized agent gives or furnishes to a licensed warehouse operator a written instruction or order, and if the order is properly made a part of the warehouse operator's records and is available for departmental inspection, then the warehouse operator:

(1) May receive the commodity for the purpose of processing or conditioning;

(2) May receive the commodity for the purpose of shipping by the warehouse operator for the account of the depositor;

(3) May accept an agricultural commodity delivered as seed and handle it pursuant to the terms of a contract with the depositor and the contract shall be considered written instructions pursuant to this section.

[ 2011 c 336 s 611; 1983 c 305 s 32; 1963 c 124 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.